Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.684

Receiver shall inventory assets—File lists of assets and claims—Objections to approved claims.

Upon taking possession of the credit union, the receiver shall make an inventory of the assets and file the list in the office of the county clerk. Upon the expiration of the time fixed for the presentation of claims, the receiver shall make a list of claims presented, segregating those approved and those rejected, to be filed in the office of the county clerk. The receiver shall also make and file with the office of the county clerk a supplemental list of claims at least fifteen days before the declaration of any liquidation dividend, and in any event at least every six months.

Objection may be made by any interested person to any claim approved by the receiver. Objections to claims approved by the receiver will be resolved by the court after providing notice to both the claimant and objector, as the court may prescribe.

[ 1997 c 397 s 74.]